bg-BG: Тип свързване на плочите: 3–щифтово/Y–образно; 4–щифтова звезда; 5–болтова звезда; 6–болтова звезда; Правоъгълен слот; Кръгъл щифт; Друго
nl: Koppelingspatroon van draaischijf: 3-nok (Y-vormig); 4-gaats ster; 5-gaats ster; 6-gaats ster; Rechthoekige sleuf; Ronde pen; Overig
zh-TW: 轉盤耦合配置: 3 孔 (Y 形); 4 孔星形; 5 孔星; 6 孔星; 長方槽; 圓釘; 其他
el: Μοτίβο σύζευξης πιάτου: 3-λοβός (σχήμα Y); Αστέρι 4 λοβών; Αστέρι 5 λοβών; Αστέρι 6 λοβών; Ορθογώνια υποδοχή; Στρογγυλό μανταλάκι; Άλλο
ko: 플레이트 결합 패턴: 3발형(Y자형); 4발 별모양; 5발 별모양; 6발 별모양; 직사각형 슬롯; 원형 핀; 기타
tr: Plaka bağlantı deseni: 3 bijonlu (Y şeklinde); 4 bijonlu yıldız; 5 bijonlu yıldız; 6 bijonlu yıldız; Dikdörtgen yuva; Yuvarlak pim; Diğer
sl-SI: Vzorec spajanja plošč: 3-uh (v obliki črke Y); 4-kraka zvezda; 5-kraka zvezda; 6-kraka zvezda; Pravokotna reža; Okrogli zatič; Druga
de: Muster des Tellerkopplers: 3-Loch (Y-förmig); 4-Loch-Stern; 5-Loch-Stern; 6-Loch-Stern; Rechteckiger Schlitz; Runder Stift; Sonstiges
th: รูปแบบการเชื่อมต่อแผ่นรอง: แบบ 3 ขา (รูปตัว Y); แบบ 4 ขา รูปดาว; แบบ 5 ขา รูปดาว; แบบ 6 ขา รูปดาว; ช่องสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ขาแบบกลม; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ napojení otočného talíře: 3výstupkové (tvar Y); 4výstupkové (do hvězdy); Hvězdice (5 matic); 6výstupkové (do hvězdy); Obdélníková drážka; Kulatý čep; Jiné
pt-BR: Padrão de acoplamento do prato: 3 pinos (em forma de Y); Estrela de 4 pinos; Estrela de 5 pinos; Estrela de 6 pinos; Abertura retangular; Pino cilíndrico; Outro
pl: Wzór sprzężenia płyt: 3-zaczepowy (Y-kształtny); 4-zaczepowa gwiazda; 5-zaczepowa gwiazda; 6-zaczepowa gwiazda; Prostokątne gniazdo; Okrągły trzpień; Inne
sk-SK: Vzor uloženia taniera: 3-otvorové (v tvare Y); 4-otvorová hviezda; 5-otvorová hviezda; 6-otvorová hviezda; Obdĺžnikový otvor; Okrúhly kolík; Iné
it: Schema di accoppiamento dei piatti: 3 alette (a forma di Y); Stella a 4 fori; Stella a 5 fori; Stella a 6 anse; fessura rettangolare; Piolo rotondo; Altro
lt-LT: Lėkštės jungties tipas: 3 briaunų (Y formos); 4 briaunų žvaigždė; 5 briaunų žvaigždė; 6 briaunų žvaigždė; Stačiakampis lizdas; Apvalus kaištis; Kita
es: Patrón de acoplamiento del plato: 3 terminales (en forma de Y); Estrella de 4 orejetas; Estrella de 5 terminales; Estrella de 6 orejetas; Ranura rectangular; Clavija redonda; Otros
nb: Platekoblingsmønster: 3-tagget (Y-formet); 4-tagget stjerne; 5-tagget stjerne; 6-tagget stjerne; Rektangulært spor; Rund plugg; Annet
sv: Plattkopplingsmönster: Fäste med 3 stift (Y-formad); Fäste med 4 stift (stjärnformad); Fäste med 5 stift (stjärnformad); Fäste med 6 stift (stjärnformad); Rektangulärt spår; Rund peg; Övrigt
hr-HR: Uzorak spajanja tanjura: 3 klina (oblik slova Y); Oblik zvijezde s 4 klina; Oblik zvijezde s 5 klinova; Oblik zvijezde sa 6 klinova; Pravokutni utor; Okrugli klin; Ostalo
pt-PT: Padrão de acoplamento de placas: 3 pinos (em forma de Y); Estrela de 4 pinos; Estrela de 5 pinos; Estrela de 6 pinos; Ranhura retangular; Pino redondo; Outro
en: Plate coupling pattern: 3-lug (Y-shaped); 4-lug star; 5-lug star; 6-lug star; Rectangular slot; Round peg; Other
da: Pladekoblingsmønster: 3-lug (Y-formet); 4-lug stjerne; 5-lug stjerne; 6-lug stjerne; Rektangulær plads; Rund pind; Andet
fi: Levyn kytkentäkuvio: Kolmisakarainen (Y:n muotoinen); Nelisakarainen tähti; Viisisakarainen tähti; Kuusisakarainen tähti; Suorakulmainen rako; Pyöreä tappi; Muu
ru: Конфигурация соединения тарелки: 3-лепестковое крепление (Y-образное); 4-лепестковая звезда; 5-лепестковая звезда; 6-лепестковая звезда; Прямоугольный паз; Круглый штифт; Другое
fr: Configuration de l’entraînement du plateau: 3 ergots (en Y); Étoile à 4 ergots; Étoile à 5 ergots; Étoile à 6 ergots; Fente rectangulaire; Ergot rond; Autre
ja: プレートカップリングのパターン: 3ラグ（Y字型）; 4ラグスター; 5ラグスター; 6ラグスター; 長方形スロット; 丸いペグ; その他
zh-CN: 托盘连接方式: 三耳（Y 形）; 四耳星型; 五角星形; 六角星形; 矩形槽; 圆形插销; 其他
ro-RO: Model de cuplare a plăcilor: 3 crestături (în formă de Y); Stea cu 4 crestături; Stea cu 5 crestături; Stea cu 6 crestături; Fantă dreptunghiulară; Pivot rotund; Altele
vi: Kiểu khớp nối của đĩa: Khớp 3 vấu (hình chữ Y); Khớp 4 vấu hình sao; Khớp 5 vấu hình sao; Khớp 6 vấu hình sao; Khe hình chữ nhật; Chốt tròn; Khác
hu: Tányércsatlakozási minta: 3 csapos (Y alakú); 4 csapos csillag; 5 csapos csillag; 6 csapos csillag; Téglalap alakú nyílás; Kerek csap; Egyéb